Utah statutes.
71-8-5.   Veterans' services coordinator qualifications -- Duties.

(1)  The veterans' services coordinator shall:

(a)  be a veteran;

(b)  have the education and experience in the use of computer technology, including databases, to collect, manage, and store information; and

(c)  have some education and experience in public relations.

(2)  The veterans' services coordinator shall be responsible to:

(a)  identify all government entities that provide services for veterans;

(b)  develop a process for coordination of veterans' services across all government entities; and

(c)  develop and provide training for veterans' affairs specialists on the coordination of veterans' services with the department.



Enacted by Chapter 308, 2013 General Session

